Oklahoma, session 2026, SB762.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 376, O.S.L.


2024 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 6301), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 6301. A. The World Health Organization, the United


Nations, and the World Economic Forum have no jurisdiction in this


state. The state and its political subdivisions, including, but not


limited to, counties, cities, towns, precincts, water districts,


school districts, school administrative units, or quasi-public


entities, shall not be compelled to engage in the enforcement of, or


any collaboration with the enforcement of, any requirements or


mandates issued by the World Health Organization, the United

Req. No. 1074 Page 1


Nations, or the World Economic Forum. No rule, regulation, fee,


tax, policy, or mandate of any kind of the World Health


Organization, United Nations, or the World Economic Forum shall be


enforced or implemented by the state or its political subdivisions.


B. Any requirements or mandates issued by the World Health


Organization, the United Nations, or the World Economic Forum shall


not be used in this state as a basis for action, nor to direct,


order, or otherwise impose, contrary to the constitution and laws of


this state, any requirements whatsoever, including those for masks,


vaccines, or medical testing, or gather any public or private


information about the state’s citizens or residents, and shall have


no force or effect in this state.


C. The state and its political subdivisions:


1. Shall resist all efforts by the World Health Organization,


the United Nations, the World Economic Forum, and other


international governmental and nongovernmental organizations to


exercise jurisdiction within this state; and


2. Shall not cooperate with efforts by United States federal


authorities to implement rules, regulations, and mandates


originating from such international governmental and nongovernmental


organizations that infringe on the sovereignty of this state and the


individual freedoms of the state’s citizens or residents.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 1074 Page 2


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1074 DC 1/19/2025 5:42:51 AM









































Req. No. 1074 Page 3